Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE B. HEALTH PROGRAMS

For expiration of this chapter, see Section 52.0008.

CHAPTER 52. SICKLE CELL TASK FORCE

Sec. 52.0001. ESTABLISHMENT OF TASK FORCE. The executive commissioner, in collaboration with the members appointed to the Newborn Screening Advisory Committee to represent the sickle cell community, shall establish and maintain a task force to raise awareness of sickle cell disease and sickle cell trait.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 3405), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 50 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 52.0002. DUTIES. (a) The task force shall study and advise the department on implementing the recommendations made in the 2018 Sickle Cell Advisory Committee Report published by the Sickle Cell Advisory Committee or any other report the executive commissioner determines is appropriate.

(b) The executive commissioner may assign tasks to the task force to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 3405), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 50 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 52.0003. COMPOSITION OF TASK FORCE. The task force is composed of the following members appointed by the executive commissioner:

(1) two members from community-based organizations with experience addressing the needs of individuals with sickle cell disease;

(2) two physicians specializing in hematology;

(3) three members of the public, one of whom has sickle cell disease or sickle cell trait and two of whom either have sickle cell disease or are a parent of a person with sickle cell disease or sickle cell trait;

(4) one representative of a health-related institution;

(5) one representative of the Texas Education Agency;

(6) one representative of the commission;

(7) one physician with experience addressing the needs of individuals with sickle cell disease or sickle cell trait;

(8) one researcher from a public health-related or academic institution with experience addressing sickle cell disease and sickle cell trait; and

(9) one health care professional with experience addressing the needs of individuals with sickle cell disease or sickle cell trait.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 3405), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 50 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (H.B. 1488), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 52.0004. ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT. The executive commissioner shall provide administrative support services at the request of the task force.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 3405), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 50 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 52.0005. PRESIDING OFFICER; MEETINGS. (a) The task force shall elect a presiding officer from among its membership.

(b) The task force shall meet at the call of the presiding officer.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 3405), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 50 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 52.0006. COMPENSATION; REIMBURSEMENT; GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. A task force member is not entitled to compensation for service on the task force but is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing task force duties. The task force may accept gifts, grants, and donations to pay for those expenses.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 3405), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 50 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 52.0007. ANNUAL REPORT. (a) Not later than December 1 of each year, the task force shall prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature an annual written report that summarizes the task force's work and includes any recommended actions or policy changes endorsed by the task force.

(b) The task force shall, in collaboration with the commission, include in the task force's annual report recommendations for improving sickle cell disease education for health care providers.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 3405), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 50 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (H.B. 1488), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 52.0008. EXPIRATION. The task force is abolished and this chapter expires August 31, 2035.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (H.B. 1488), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.